Nebraska, session 109, LB687.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB687 LB687
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Firearm Industry Nondiscrimination Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Firearm Industry Nondiscrimination Act:
(1) Ammunition means a loaded cartridge or shot shell, case, primer,
projectile, wadding, or propellant powder;
(2)(a) Company means a for-profit organization, association,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited
liability partnership, or limited liability company, including a wholly
owned subsidiary, a majority-owned subsidiary, a parent company, or an
affiliate of such an entity that exists to make a profit.
(b) The term does not include a sole proprietorship;
(3)(a) Contract means a promise or set of promises constituting an
agreement between the parties that gives each a legal duty to the other
and the right to seek a remedy for the breach of those duties.
(b) The term does not include an agreement related to investment
services;
(4)(a) Discriminate against a firearm entity or firearm trade
association means, with respect to the entity or association, to:
(i) Refuse to engage in the trade of any goods or services with the
entity or association based on its status as a firearm entity or firearm
trade association, which includes the lawful products and services
provided by, and the lawful practices of, firearm entities and firearm
trade associations;
(ii) Refrain from continuing an existing business relationship with
the entity or association based on its status as a firearm entity or
firearm trade association, which includes the lawful products and
services provided by, and the lawful practices of, firearm entities and
firearm trade associations; or
(iii) Terminate an existing business relationship with the entity or
association based on its status as a firearm entity or firearm trade
association, which includes the lawful products and services provided by,
-2-

LB687 LB687
2025 2025
and the lawful practices of, firearm entities and firearm trade
associations.
(b) The term does not include the policies of a vendor, merchant,
retail seller, or platform that restrict or prohibit the listing or
selling of ammunition, firearms, or firearm accessories.
(c) The term also does not include a company's refusal to engage in
the trade of any goods or services, decision to refrain from continuing
an existing business relationship, or decision to terminate an existing
business relationship to comply with federal, state, or local laws,
policies, or regulations or a directive by a regulatory agency, or for
any traditional business reason that is specific to the customer or
potential customer and not based solely on the status of an entity or
association as a firearm entity or firearm trade association, which
includes the lawful products and services provided by, and the lawful
practices of, firearm entities and firearm trade associations;
(5) Firearm means a weapon that expels a projectile by the action of
explosive or expanding gases;
(6)(a) Firearm accessory means a device specifically designed or
adapted to enable an individual to wear, carry, store, or mount a firearm
on the individual or on a conveyance and an item used in conjunction with
or mounted on a firearm that is not essential to the basic function of
the firearm.
(b) The term includes a detachable firearm magazine;
(7) Firearm entity means:
(a) A firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition manufacturer,
distributor, wholesaler, supplier, or retailer; or
(b) A gun range;
(8) Firearm trade association means any person, corporation,
unincorporated association, federation, business league, or business
organization that:
(a) Is not organized or operated for profit and for which none of
-3-

LB687 LB687
2025 2025
its net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or
individual;
(b) Has two or more firearm entities as members; and
(c) Is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as an organization described by
section 501(c) of such code;
(9) Governmental entity means:
(a) Any state agency; and
(b) Any political subdivision of this state;
(10) Sole-source provider means a supplier who provides goods or
services of a unique nature or goods or services that are solely
available through the supplier and the supplier is the only practicable
source to provide the goods or services; and
(11) State agency means any agency, board, or commission of this
state other than the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges,
the courts, the Legislature, or any officer or state agency established
by the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 3. (1) The Firearm Industry Nondiscrimination Act shall apply
to a contract that:
(a) Is between a governmental entity and a company with at least ten
full-time employees;
(b) Has a value of at least one hundred thousand dollars that is
paid wholly or partly from public funds of the governmental entity; and
(c) Is entered into on or after the effective date of this act.
(2) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, a governmental
entity shall not enter into a contract with a company for the purchase of
goods or services unless the contract contains a written verification
from the company that it:
(a) Does not have a practice, policy, guidance document, or
directive that discriminates against a firearm entity or firearm trade
association; and
-4-

LB687 LB687
2025 2025
(b) Will not discriminate against a firearm entity or firearm trade
association during the term of the contract.
Sec. 4. The requirements of section 3 of this act do not apply if a
governmental entity:
(1) Contracts with a sole-source provider; or
(2) Does not receive a bid from a company that is able to provide
the written verification required by section 3 of this act.
Sec. 5. The Department of Administrative Services has the authority
and responsibility of reviewing state agency contracts to confirm that
the requirements of the Firearm Industry Nondiscrimination Act have been
satisfied.
-5-